Rhode Island statutes. Title 4 Animals and Animal Husbandry
Chapter 13 Dogs
4-13-42.
Care of dogs.

It shall be a violation of this section for an owner or keeper to:

Keep any dog on a permanent tether that restricts movement of the tethered dog to an area less than one hundred thirteen square feet (113 sq. ft.), or less than a six foot (6´) radius at ground level.

Tether a dog with a choke-type collar, head collar, or prong-type collar. The weight of any chain or tether shall not exceed one-eighth (1/8) of the dog’s total body weight.

Keep any dog tethered for more than ten (10) hours during a twenty-four-hour (24) period or keep any dog confined in an area or primary enclosure for more than fourteen (14) hours during any twenty-four-hour (24) period, and more than ten (10) hours during a twenty-four-hour (24) period, if the area is not greater than that which is required under the most recently adopted version of the department of environmental management’s rules and regulations governing animal care facilities.

Tether a dog anytime from the hours of ten o’clock p.m. (10:00 p.m.) to six o’clock a.m. (6:00 a.m.), except for a maximum of fifteen (15) minutes.

Keep any dog outside, either tethered or otherwise confined, when the ambient temperature is beyond the industry standard for the weather safety scale as set forth in the most recent adopted version of the Tufts Animal Care and Condition Weather Safety Scale (TACC).

It shall be a violation of this section for an owner or keeper to fail to provide a dog with adequate feed, adequate water, or adequate veterinary care as those terms are defined in §

4-19-2

; provided however, that adequate veterinary care may be provided by an owner using acceptable animal husbandry practices.

Exposing any dog to adverse weather conditions strictly for the purpose of conditioning shall be prohibited.

The provisions of this section, as they relate to the duration and timeframe of tethering or confinement, shall not apply:

If the tethering or confinement is authorized for medical reasons in writing by a veterinarian licensed in Rhode Island, the authorization is renewed annually, and shelter is provided;

If tethering or confinement is authorized in writing by an animal control officer, or duly sworn police officer assigned to the animal control division, for the purposes, including, but not limited to, hunting dogs, dogs protecting livestock, and sled dogs. Written authorization must be renewed annually. The written authorization issued by an animal control officer or duly sworn police officer assigned to the animal control division in the political subdivision of the state where the dogs are kept shall be considered valid in every other political subdivision of the state. The written authorization issued by an animal control officer or duly sworn police officer assigned to the animal control division in the political subdivision of the state where the dogs are kept is revocable by that animal control officer or police officer if there are any conditions present that warrant revocation. The conditions include, but are not limited to, changes in the number or type of dogs, changes in the facility structure or safety, and changes in the health of the dog;

To any entity licensed by the state pursuant to chapter 19 of title 4, or any veterinary facility; or

[Deleted by P.L. 2018, ch. 118, § 1 and P.L. 2018, ch. 198, § 1.]

[Deleted by P.L. 2018, ch. 118, § 1 and P.L. 2018, ch. 198, § 1.]

To an exhibitor holding a class C license under the Animal Welfare Act (7 U.S.C. § 2133) that are temporarily in the state, if authorized by the department of environmental management (DEM).

[Deleted by P.L. 2018, ch. 118, § 1 and P.L. 2018, ch. 198, § 1.]

Any person in violation of this section shall be imprisoned not exceeding eleven (11) months, or fined not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor exceeding five hundred dollars ($500), or both. Each day of violation shall constitute a separate offense.

General agents or special agents of the Rhode Island Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals (RISPCA) are hereby authorized to enforce the provisions of this chapter in cooperation with animal control officers and the department of environmental management (DEM).

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 301, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 358, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 187, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 265, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 118, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 198, § 1.

4-13-43.
Prohibition of breed specific regulation.

No city or town may enact any rule, regulation or ordinance specific to any breed of dog or cat in the exercise of its power to further control and regulate dogs, cats or other animals as authorized by this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 450, § 1.

4-13-44.
Minimum maturity level for sale of dogs.

Except as otherwise authorized under any other provision of law, it shall be a crime, punishable as specified in subsection (c) of this section, for any person to sell or transfer (as further described within subsection (b) of this section) one or more dogs that are not fully weaned unless, prior to any physical transfer of the dog or dogs from the seller/transferor to the purchaser/transferee, the dog or dogs are approved for sale, as evidenced by written documentation from a veterinarian licensed to practice in Rhode Island.

For the purposes of this section, the sale or transfer of a dog or dogs shall not be considered complete, and thereby subject to the requirements and penalties of this section, unless and until the seller/transferor physically transfers the dog or dogs to the purchaser/transferee.

Any person who violates this section shall be subject to imprisonment not to exceed twelve (12) months or a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

With respect to the sale of two (2) or more dogs in violation of this section, each dog unlawfully sold or transferred shall represent a separate offense.

This section shall not apply in instances where the following types of organizations place a dog into “foster care” pursuant to their respective current practices of operation:

An organization, as defined in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, or animal shelter, as defined in §

4-19-2

; and

A pound or dog pound as defined in §

4-19-2

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 161, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 267, § 1.